 Mexican men are macho rapists, gangsters or ineffective bureaucrats. Mexican women are semi-pagan, pious fools. There are self-serving corporate types and even a pushy, culturally-insensitive liberal female reporter.  The story is absurd, the characters are unbelievable, the stereotypes are offensive.
 This movie was one of the worst I have ever seen. The acting wasn't good, it was very predictable, and some parts of the plot were competly unnecessary. The worst bit of acting was when Yellow comes home, his owner has no expression when he sees him and does not look even remotely happy. If you want predictable, watch a survival movie. What happens, almost always, is a person gets lost in the wilderness in an accident, they struggle to survive, they are found, and then brought home. "Far From Home" is no exception. As for unnecessary, the whole "romance" part of this movie was badly done and not needed. The girl gives him cookies and kisses him when he comes home, and all the while, the boy of her affections remains pretty much obtuse. Also some parts of this movie might upset young children, such as the time he kills a rabbit and when Yellow can't be rescued. All in all, I would not advise anyone to see this movie; in fact, I would warn against it.
 Classics remain beloved for hundreds of years because they are wonderfully crafted and contain universal truths that still speak to us. The director and producer of this condescending adaptation of Dumas' classic story must feel that the modern American audience doesn't have the intelligence to appreciate great classic works.  Oh, the basic story line is there--man is wronged, man goes to prison, man escapes, man finds treasure, man seeks revenge. But that is where the homage to this great work ends and the often ridiculous changes are made. I know that it is cliche to say that the movie is not as good as the book. In this case, however, I can't believe they actually had the audacity to call the movie by the same name as the classic novel which it so minimally follows.  One can excuse some adaptations of a novel when produced as a screenplay, but the changes made in this case lose all the beauty and terrible power of the original story. Instead of a wonderful slow burn with a lot of atmosphere as Dantes slowly and painstakingly weaves a web of revenge for the wrongs done to him, we have stupid devices like a flamboyant entry in a hot air balloon, complete with Cirque du Soleil acrobats twisting on the ropes. Instead of an intricate plan to destroy the personages who wronged him, we have swashbuckling sword fights every few scenes.  Some major characters are missing completely (such as Valentine) some have been shamelessly changed and substituted (Jacopo for Ali). The final plot device is totally contrived and NOT in the book--we find out that Dantes has a son sired on Mercedes before he was arrested. I guess the screenwriters felt they had to put some sex in the story or no one would like it.  I awaited this production eagerly; having now seen it I feel disgusted and insulted.  If you want to see an intelligent production of the Count of Monte Cristo, avoid this movie like the Black Death. It would be better to lock the DVD in the Chateau D'If. If you haven't read the book, you may enjoy it, since you won't be dissapointed by what is lacking. It does have good scenery and filming, although some of the acting is terrible (Jacopo especially).  To the director and producers
 While this maybe an entertainig movie for the ones who have not read the book, it is an abomination for those of us who cherish one of the world's greatest classics.  It is like Romeo and Juliette getting married and live happily ever after.  There are indeed beautiful scenes, good acting and an appealing story the movie is not really reflecting the book.  I was thoroughly disgusted walking out of the theater. I would very highly recommend the 1974 version with Richard Chaimberlain as a much better film
 If you read and loved the book, then most likely this movie isn't for you.  The only similarities between the two being Dantes imprisonment and escape.  I have yet to see a movie version of the Count of Monte Cristo that gets the story right, the closest being the 1975 Richard Chamberlain version, but even that one had it's flaws.  A summery of this movie would be Edmond Dantes' life is ruined by his greedy friend, but after tweleve years in prison, Dantes comes back, gets his vengence, and Mercedes and his life goes back to how it was twelve years ago.  The book is so much deeper, and this unrealistic fairy tale ending makes the whole movie feel flat.
 I had just finished reading the book and decided I'd like see how it was adapted to the big screen.  This version was the worst adaptation I've seen of a book made into a movie.  As I watched the film I wondered if the makers of the movie even bothered to read the book.  My girlfriend kept asking me during the film if "that happened in the book?"  At the end of the movie I told her that basically everything in the movie was not how it occurred in the book.  She enjoyed the movie until the end when it was like a "cheesy 80's montage".  The book is wonderful.  When I finished reading it, I felt like I had lost a good friend-I wished I could just keep reading it and reading it.  I've never read such an excellent novel.
 Probably the worst re-telling of a great novel I have ever seen. Only scant resemblence to the Dumas book appears in this movie. the screenplay is contrived and the action uneven at best. It's too bad because the actors do a nice job with their roles. This may be an unfair criticism because I couldn't bear to watch this thing to the end. The version with Gerard Depardieu is no more satisfying or faithful to the original source. For the new generation of moviegoers, try to see the made for TV movie with Richard Chamberlain as Dantes. You'll enjoy Alexandre Dumas much more than Alexandre Dumb...
 If you have read Dumas' The Count of Monte Cristo then you know that it is a tale that begins but developing the character of Edmond Dantes.  He is a simple man whose main ambition is to marry the beautiful Mercedes.  He proposes to her and on the night of their engagement he is arrested for treason, betrayed by his best friend.  This is a summation of the first chapter.  The second and maybe third chapter relates his time in prison, learning and growing from his relationship with a fellow prisoner.  He also learns from this prisoner the location of a treasure suitable for a dozen kings.  The remaining 90% of the book relates the immensley complicated details of his revenge on those that tore from him the life he held so precious.  It is a tale of intrigue and revenge that takes its time to build and develop.  When you see the traps swinging closed on Dante's enemies you feel a sense of accomplishment with him.  Now, on to the movie.  The first full half of the movie relates Dante's betrayal and captivity.  This leaves only an hour to illustrate his revenge.  What is accomplished is a sad imitation of Alexandre Dumas' master work.  This is one of my favorite books, and one of my least favorite movies.  Hollywood's need for adventure movies to be fast paced to match today's lifestyle has ruined this story for many people.  They just don't know it.
 This was only useable elsewhere. It said wrong area when I inserted it, But Im told it cant be returned if 'opened' I just took off the cellophane. Why agree to sell and post a DVD to the UK when it was impossible to watch?? a big con trick
 It finally arrived after waiting over a month....it was sent with no protective wrapping of any kind and was damaged...as was the case it arrived in...I was very disatisfied and not pleased...from now on I will only order strictly from amazon.
 I ordered a Used-Like New dvd, and the dvd was packaged nicely with a seemingly new and glossed cover. However, after popping it into the dvd player, the movie played till about half of the time and started freezing and showing no picture but sound. I initially thought something was wrong with my dvd player, so I took the dvd to my friends computers, three of them, and the same error showed at the same place in the movie. I was so frustrated because I loved this movie so much that I was so happy to now have an actual dvd copy of it; however, that was a fail. Because it was Used dvd nonetheless, I felt scammed. The sellers must have had checked whether the dvd worked properly or not, but they still sold it--to me. Please check your USED CD/DVDs before reselling it back! In the end, I asked for a refund, and I hope I get it.
 Calling this movie after Alexandre Dumas' original novel is like calling Bernstein's 'West Side Story' 'Romeo and Julliette' after Shakespeare's work. So many elements of the story were altered that Dumas' original plot and theme are no longer recognizable except for the names of some of the characters. They might as well call this film 'The Count of Hollywood' and set the story in modern L.A. instead of 19th century France.    In this film, Dantes is informed of the mission to rescue Napoleon from the onset as opposed to finding about it when returning to shore. Danglars is barely in the picture and is cast as a pirate instead of a banker. Mercedes marries Fernand one month after Dantes is imprisoned instead of 18 months (So much for her loyalty
 This review is not of the movie, which I love and why I want it on bluray, the review is of the actual bluray disc.  I bought the movie and exchanged it twice all for the same problems
 I can't belive they dis such a horrible work on this movie, if they would have stuck to the plot that went on in THE BOOK, you know, where they got the idea from, then the movie would have been a success.  But since hollywood likes to ruin great works of art, then they do what they did with this movie, they BLEW IT!!!! If you really want to get the true feel of The Count Of Monte Cristo,  then READ THE BOOK, YOU WON'T BE DISSAPOINTED THERE.
 Apparently someone who read the book 5 years ago gave the screenwriter a brief rundown on the plot. Holy [cow]. I really enjoyed the book and this was a big letdown.  Huge parts of movie are new, and enormous pieces of the original plot are left out.  It would be one thing if the changes made the transition to film easier, (as with Lord of the Rings), but I don't think they even tried. Dumas is not exactly the most daring or controversial writer; I'm not sure why a perfectly good story, and ending, had to be filled up with enough dairy to rival a cheese castle. If you haven't read the book in a while or at all and you do like this movie, or even if you think it was allright, please take the time to read or review the book. Maybe the makers didn't want to spoil the book for that haven't read it, I'm not sure.  There's much more satisfaction at the end than an illegitimate child and a duel between two people that were never "boyhood friends. As I write this, I am about 500 pages into reading the book.  I decided to watch this because I was certain that, as a major Hollywood production, it would not reveal to me any of the plot I have not yet encountered.  Man, I hate being right sometimes. Scene 1
 Very inferior to the 1975 Richard Chamberlain version. It's as if a chimp took a sledgehammer to the story and knocked all the sense out of it. The characters are dumbed down and the actors are forced into flat caricatures (except for a fine performance by Richard Harris). Caviezal is unable to transform the guileless young Dantes into the dynamic Machiavellian. When he makes his entrance as The Count of Monte Cristo, he limply floats onto the scene and sighs, "Glad you could all make it to my party." Since most of the movie was shot in the dark, there is little for the eyes here. Even the music disappoints.
 After finishing Dumas' classic novel, I immediatly watched this movie. About an hour later, and a hillarious balloon scene, I sadly ejected the DVD, which I now use for a coaster. If you've never read the book, you've got nothing to lose. But if you've ever read the book, you get that sense of annoyance very quickly, and outrage towards the end. Do yourself a favor and read the book first! It is excellent!
 I understand such a huge book can not be transferred wholly to the big screen, but the script deviates drastically from the book in the way it ends. Had i known that, i wouldn't have bought it.  There are some very nice scenes & cinematography.
 This DVD would not play due to parameters.  Read carefully ...REGION 2.  Will not play in America.  Total Fail for me!<a href="http
 Well this is a great movie but have not had the pleasure of getting to watch it because I am out of region. What does that mean anyway!? Not sure but don't buy anything if out of a region cause it won't play. Guess ya live and learn!
 The Count of Monte Cristo in the original book starts off as a young and naive sailor. But the betrayal by his supposed friends and his unjust imprisonment turns him into someone very different.  He presents himself at different times as enigmatic, dangerous, cunning, able to bend criminals to his will and to lure aristocrats into becoming his friend.  He finds out the inner secrets of each of his enemies and turns their weaknesses into their downfall.  This character is perhaps the most romantic in fiction and one of the most complex.  The script does the actors a serious disservice, but a stronger actor in the role of the Count could still have done a good job of showing us the deep undercurrent of anger that drove his actions and made him believable.  Unfortunately, James Caviezel isn't capable of bringing that depth of acting to the role.  The people who enjoyed the mini-series/film either never read the book or have forgotten what it was really like.
 I opened this "new" DVD and it skipped every 20 to 30 seconds throughout the entire movie. I would not recommend buying a DVD from this seller, as it may not work properly.
 The book, The Count of Monte Cristo, is one of my favorites.  I know that movies can miss certain elements in the book and that usually the book is better.  So I can forgive most movies even if they miss some things.  But this movie seems to have missed the point entirely.  It seems that they thought sword fights and one-liners where what this story is about.  Where the book created this fully fleshed world of Edmond Dantes, the movie is like the superficial Hollywood version of the hastily read cliff notes.  If you are looking for a movie that takes the themes from this book accurately, then watch the movie, SLEEPERS.  (with Jason Patrick, Brad Pitt, Robert DeNiro, etc.)  Even though the time and place and people are entirely different, the story of this film rings more true to the heart of the novel, The Count of Monte Cristo, than any film version of the book I've ever seen.  Read the book, and watch both movies and you'll see why.
 For those of you who have read the book (abridged or unabridged), be prepared to be dissapointed!  The only similarity that the movie and the book share is the name itself.  It is a travesty that somebody can re-write a classic literary work into something like a made-for-tv movie!  Check that...there is a made-for-tv series in French (made by Bravo, I believe) that is the closest depiction of The Count of Monte Cristo that I have ever seen.  I would not waste my time watching thismovie!  See the bravo flick...not this one!
 What an unmitigated piece of garbage.  Richard Harris is always wonderful but he's the only redeeming feature of this perverse twisting of Dumas' classic.  See the G&eacute;rard Depardieu mini-series instead.  (If you can ignore the fact that he doesn't look starved in the Chateau d'If, it's wonderful.)  Except for Harris the acting is poor.  The people are unrealistic and are, at best, caricatures of Dumas' creations.  The writer has committed a crime.
 I have a blu-ray player that is a year old.  The firmware is from this year. This is the first blu-ray disc that will not play.  I tried two copies that were in perfect condition.  Do not buy this disk.
 This movie is the events of Dumas' classic stamped onto a canned Hollywood adventure/love story.  The formula is the same used in 80's montage movies
 I had to return this Blue Ray twice and I still don't have a working copy. finaly I told Amazon to refund my purchase. the disc would not play on my new Sony BR player. I updated my firmware and other BR discs played on my player, but I was never able to get this disc to play.
 Why is it that so many filmmakers believe that they can improve upon classic novels by changing them?  Such conceit rarely results in a movie that is a credit to the novel upon which it is based, few surpass the original, and this is certainly no exception. Jim Caviezel is certainly eye candy in this movie, and if you are interested in that, or in seeing a VERY YOUNG Henry Cavill (of the Tudors), then by all means buy this movie.  However, if you want to enjoy "The Count of Monte Cristo," slog through the book.  This is NO substitute.  Most of the plot has been stripped away, and that which remains has been altered beyond recognition.
 This is easily one of the five worst movies I've ever seen. Forget that, it's one of the *two* worst movies I've ever seen. While Guy Pearce is usually an excellent actor, and Jim Caviezel has the perfect look for Edmund Dantes (at least, post-imprisonment), there is nothing that could have saved such a woefully terrible screenplay. The Dumas novel is one of the best books I've ever read, filled with intrigue, action, and mystery, with vibrant characters and brilliant plotting. Granted, adapting such a grand story to the screen would probably take four hours or more, but if one isn't going to attempt an adaptation of the original story, then one should just make a new movie. That being said, all the interesting, original parts of the book were removed and replaced with a cookie-cutter revenge plot, stereotypical, one-dimensional characters, and bland dialogue that too often inserts modern slang into Napoleonic-era France. This movie is the "Count of Monte Cristo" in name only, and in every other way, a poorly conceived, vapid, dime-a-dozen action flick. Avoid it at all costs.
 I've been itching to buy this movie since I saw it in the theatre. Now I'm going to have to wait until they release a widescreen version because there's no way I'm paying for pan&scan. A beautifully crafted film both in visuals and acting, not to mention the masterful story telling. The only letdown is not having widescreen, which is unforgivable and therefore this DVD release gets one star, for what would otherwise be a five star rating.
 My only reason for seeing this film is because  Luis Guzman is in it.  I find these Napoleon/Shakespeare/pirate films to very very dull, boring and over-long.    Luis plays a much different role here than what we are use to seeing.  Doesn't he look handsome in that red English coat?
 The DVD was from the wrong region - didn't even know that was possible. So irritated I didn't want to mess with return process.Still don't have my DVD,  ) 
 One thing I want to point out about this documentary is it starts out talking about personal credit card debt and approximately 30 mins into the documentary starts to talk about national debt and how much national debt the U.S. owes. In economics, personal credit card debt and the national debt are two very different issues. I find it dishonest that the filmmakers would mislead consumers by lumping both types of debt together - they are separate issues and need to be addressed as such.  I would agree with the part of the film where it states "debt is a much larger symptom of economic and structural issues facing households" and that "households are facing declining and stagnating incomes while costs are skyrocketing". I certainly agree that public policy must be changed to address such issues, however, the film barely touched upon this topic.  I kept waiting to hear solutions the film would propose to address personal credit card debt in this nation - whether those solutions be on a personal or national level. In the end, the film gave about a 5-minute soundbite on the how this issue needs to be addressed at the community level.  Overall, poorly organized documentary that goes off on tangents. The mention of faith-based solutions at the end without elaborating on what such solutions are rounded off an already weak movie.
 The least informative documentary I have ever seen and I am a career student.  This documentary provided no proof for its claims. All of the claims are backed by indivdual opinions with no creditability. Dont waste your money... Email me and I will mail you my copy.
 I took a chance on this low cost download, hoping the low-budget art-house movie would interest my mind and entertain me.  First, the digital quality forced me to either sit far back or to shrink the image on my screen.  I've have better image quality with VHS videos.  The best attributes of the content were a decent makeup/face of the actor playing the artist, and a plain-looking painted wall in one of the rooms had some 'potential'.  Other than that, there is nothing to interest the viewer visually.  The asylum and people don't look like late 19th Century southern France.  They don't even try to behave, look, or sound French.  Just a little is all that's needed for the viewers imaginations to pick up on something.  No views of the countryside or closeups of anything interesting to set the stage or mood.  Lighting skills were absent.  The entire first 20 minutes could have been just a few lines with some emotion and visuals to set the tone, but rather it's an immense amount of words spoken by the actor either to himself or to someone else.  Worse, the words are like they are read from a poorly written book.  No other conflicts, nothing else going on, and simply no theatrical or cinematic 'artistry'.  After 20 minutes, I fast forwarded to see if anything else happened different, but was disappointed.  I've seen low budget do well before, but this lacks all those little elements that are needed to make it something entertaining.
 The actor playing Van Gogh has the mannerisms and speech patterns of Woody Allen. It's the worst acting I've ever seen, and there's nothing else to focus on, as the film is nothing but a series of hallucinated conversations interrupted by stuttering, hand-wringing monologues.
 the stream was pixelated and kept on stopping and starting. There was no smooth stream. I tried to watch it at different times on 2 different computers same results
 If you thought "Bela Lugosi Meets a Brooklyn Gorilla had to be the worst Sammy Petrillo movie, think again. In 2007 I said of Petrillo's performance in that vastly better (!) production "...be advised that Sammy Petrillo may be the most annoying man in show business, and in retrospect that was generous. "Keyholes are for Peeping features Petrillo in a dual role
 Imagine you are a woman living in the United States, and a foreign fighter (Pick any of the convenient enemies - The Soviets, Al Qaida, The French, etc) invades your town, killing your husband and trying to destroy your very way of life.  Imagine again, that within 6 months, he has learned everything there is to know about being an American, and has embraced the American culture and now becomes a leader in the fight against his own countrymen. So dedicated is he to his new "family", that he even goes into battle wearing your dead husband's uniform.  Did I mention that you have fallen madly in love with him?  If this sounds too far-fetched to be true, imagine the same story, only you are Japanese, a race and culture renowned for excluding outsiders and foreigners, as well as a culture that is almost impenetrable in its subtlety.  Unbelieveable, isn't it? Apparently, not if you're Tom Cruise.
 "Not Real History But A Fun Fantasy Adventure" March 4, 2004 "Not Real History But A Fun Fantasy Adventure", is a simple way to describe this movie. I was very excited to hear this movie was coming out. I not only admire Edward Zwick's other movies but I am a Tom Cruise fan as well. Unfortunately I was very disappointed in the movie, Tom Cruise was fantastic and the cinematography is beautiful but the film is almost completely "factless". America did open up trade with Japan but French and German officers trained the Japanese imperial army, They at the time had the best Foot soldiers. Also the young Emperor of Japan was not torn between the new and old ways, He instead was the driving force behind modernizing Japan as fast as it did, he saw the Samurai as one of the main reasons Japan had fallen so far behind. The Samurai that rebelled against the Emperor were considered "RONIN" meaning Samurai with no master, and sense Samurai means "To serve" they were despised by the Samurai that served the Emperor and were perceived as Dishonorable. The rebel Samurai also had full divisions that used Firearms, it was not the Bows vs. Rifles you see in the movie. And most importantly it was not the Honorable Samurai protecting the Peasant people from the heartless new way of the Evil imperial Japanese Government, quit the opposite is true. Japan had been divided for more then a century, the clans had known nothing but war. When the Shogun took power the Emperor was nothing more then a symbol and was never allowed to leave his Palace. The Shogun had the real power and the whole time it was most of Japan, the peasants and working class that suffered under the Samurai, They were Honorable warriors but only to other Samurai, ordinary Japanese were considered Less then Men and could be killed at the whims of the Samurai. It was the modernization of Japan that threatened the rule of the Samurai with the Shogun being forced to step down in 1867 and put the power back in the hands of the Emperor as well as the working class of Japan. Most Samurai saw this and surrendered the old way to the new seeing that The Samurai were obsolete, but the few that rebelled were motivated by Power, status and wealth that they were losing and not for the People of Japan like the film so badly suggests. This is a fun film if you watch it as a fantasy adventure with no basis in history. I give it a low rating because even thought both Tom Cruise and Edward Zwick admit that this is not what really happened but wanted to capture the spirit of the Samurai in a fiction film, I feel this is irresponsible and that this film dishonors The real history of Japan. I would like to add that the Chinese feel Honoring the Samurai and Japanese values is like Honoring Nazis and their way of life and I don't blame them for feeling that way considering there History.
 This film is an absolute load of steamer.  I died laughing watching it at the theater, and then again when i saw it on dvd. Tom Cruise, arguably the most over-rated actor in the past 50 years, would have been waxed in the scene where he is taken hostage to start with.  the very ethic the movie takes such pains to over-illustrate would have had it no other way. the japanese guys did a decent job, but i couldn't help but think they were just there to cash hollywood checks.  It is rather like when American actors come to Japan to do a friggin car commercial.  There is no critical fallout, so why bother?  Why indeed.
 Oh how I wish I could spend three months in the mountains and come out speaking flawless Japanese... -__-   This film is one of those ones that aspires to show everyone in a politically correct light and ruthlessly employs stereotypes galore to attempt to do it. The noble white man comes to the tiny idyllic remote village and is reformed and turned to the way of bushido by the kind and benevolent natives who come to respect him too. Even gets to fall in love with the demure  ;perfect ; widow of the man he killed. And on top of that, he manages to change the mind of the emperor! How far we've come in making films that don't depict Asian stereotypes. -_-   The historical problems with this film are huge, but then again it didn't claim to be a documentary. The real problems lie in the representation of women, and the romantization of the culture (everything from bushido to the army).   There are some redeeming qualities, which include Ken Watanabe's excellent performance, and the beautiful and lush scenery/clothing which was relatively authentic. (I know most of this was shot in Canada...but the set pieces were very well researched)   If you want a film with substance, start checking out films from people actually from Japan. Zatoichi, and Twilight Samurai (both currently playing in select cities) come to mind, or any of the works of Akira Kurosawa.   Or for a different spin with beautiful visuals, check out China's Hero (soon to be released on the big screen here).
 Decent acting, decent actors, terrible writting, no research into Japanese customs whatsoever, almost as insulting as  ;Rising Sun. ;  Waste of over two hours.
 Samurai were not that stupid. I don't particularly like some aspects of classic Japanese culture (excessive obsession over honor and conformity), but the one thing they do better than most other Asian cultures is adapt military technologies when given the opportunity.  To imply that there was a group of Japanese Samurai who refused to use fire-arms is retarded. The Japanese have used guns since they first encountered them from the Europeans in the early 1400's, from these they reverse engineered. Japanese Warlords have won the entire country with rifle-men.  Historically, there really were a group of samurai who rebelled against a modernizing Japan. And they really did fight to death. And they really did only used swords.  But not due to a retarded dogmatic aversion to guns, but because they ran out of gun-powder in their last battle.  Also the idea that the last and only surviving samurai would be a white man is insulting.
 I held this one off for a long time. I was at the very bottom of my list of movies to see. I just knew it was gonna be trash. Aside from some breathtaking photography this film is dumbed down Hollywood trash. An insult to Japanese filmakers like Akira Kurosawa (Seven Samurai) and Hiroshi Inagaki (Samurai Trilogy) who's Samurai films have captured the hearts of audeinces worldwide.  Not only is this film a rip off of those directors but it's also a poor attempt at mimicing Hollywood epics like Braveheart. Probably the worst thing about this film is Tom Cruise's occaisional narration of his diary. What kind of warrior keeps a diary anyway? Isn't that for pansies? Anyway it serves as pointless drivel that mearly point's out the allready obvious. It's like they tried to make this film idiot proof. I think they should have focused on making it average joe/jane pissed off cause they spent 5 bucks to rent this crap proof.   The Characater development in this film was pretty much the same any Jean Claued Van Damme film. Last time I checked  ;Kickboxer ; or  ;Bloodsport ; didn't get nominated for any Academy Awards. I was just waiting for a training montage.  That's all I'm gonna write about this film. I have better stuff to review.
 This film fails both historically and morally.   The real Imperial Army was not inept and cowardly as shown in this film.  Every Japanese history textbook I've ever read says that the conscript soldiers were disdained by the haughty samurai, but that they proved their bravery and worth in the battles against them.  There's nothing in this film that shows the arrogance and contempt the samurai had for the  ;dirt farmers ; whom they expected to easily defeat, but who stood their ground and shot them to pieces.  The samurai, incidentally, had just as many cannons and muskets as their opponents.  I cannot understand why the filmmaker had to make the samurai's enemies so evil and stupid, instead of portraying the war as a sincere clash of cultures between men who fought for what they belived in.   Morally, it really hurt me to see Tom Cruise (Algren) wading so cold-bloodedly into the teenage troops he had been training six months ago and butchering them without the slightest compunction.  And there wasn't even any sort of remorse voiced by Cruise/Algren, even in a cliched, off-the-cuff sort of way ( ;Many brave men on both sides will die today. ;).  Maybe he hacked to death that poor, scared man he was trying to teach how to shoot earlier in the film.   This is one of those films that, like  ;The Patriot ;, gets every cuff button and chin-strap of the costumes right, but fails to capture the spirit of an era and its people by resorting to black-and-white/good-and-evil cliches.  It looks geat, but has a rotten core.
 Apart from being slow, condescending, cliched and overblown, this film is hilarously, and unintentionally ironic. An American from an American-backed 'peace keeping force' joins with a bunch of reactionary rebels. Amazingly, the rebels are right to despise 'western ways' in their desire to cling to 'traditional' beliefs. Guns, progress and capitalism aren't, apparently, the basis for inner peace. In the face of impossible odds, it's still better to die an honourable death in the face of automatic weapons. So, presumably, the follow up will be something like 'Last Jihad Warrior' where Tom Cruise joins the Iraqi Shi'ite militia in a vainglorious rebellion against Apache attack helicopters.
 (...) Haters of Western Culture have no fear
 At every opportunity this movie failed in the presentation of its larger themes.  To begin with, the presentation of honor, as illustrated through the statements and military tactics of the rebel samurai leader, demonstrated a grotesque misunderstanding of the term.  The idea that honor somehow requires a military leader to ignore cutting edge military technology, i.e. firearms, or to blindly charge forward at a numerically superior and better armed foe is laughable.  Furthermore, the healing power of love can hardly be demonstrated by a widow who jumps in bed with her husband's killer before his corpse is even cold, even if the killer is Tom Cruise.  On a side note, I could hardly restrain my laughter when Cruise's character appears in the doorway of the widow's house wearing her husband's armor.  Regarding the below comments about the racially insensitive aspects of this movie, I completely agree.  If I was Japanese, I would be annoyed at how Tom Cruise's American character, after spending only a short time in the samurai village, ultimately holds himself out to be the highest exponent of the samurai virtues and then presumes to instruct the Emperor on how to act.  I get hot under the collar when Europeans comment about how Americans should act or vote.  I can only imagine that people of Japanese citizenship or descent would have a similar reaction to the manner in which samurai culture was depicted in this film.
 Wonderful movie, one of the best you'll ever experience and since most reviewers wrote a lot about this movie I won't.  The DVD was very disappointing to me because this movie was based on Japan and it's history, however, it doesn't offer you to watch the movie in Japanese or it doesn't even offer the Japanese subtitle!!!  They offer the typical, Spanish and French!  It would have improved this DVD greatly if they had an option to either watch it in Japanese or to watch it with Japanese subtitle.
 No wonder the Japanese people hate this movie.  It's not only the stereotypes (most of the Japanese characters were faceless or ugly, and in general violent and, hmm, stereotyped).  It's also the pretentious way of fitting an Oriental philosophy in a Westerner's world.  I'm not against meshing the best of different worlds.  I'm just saying the novel and the movie are purely made to make money, and there's nothing philosophical or endearing about the story or the main character.  Of course, it has to end with the white man taking the Asian woman as his bride.  No wonder the Japanese hate this movie.
 "Not Real History But A Fun Fantasy Adventure", is a simple way to describe this movie. I was very excited to hear this movie was coming out. I have written several papers on the subject and not only admire Edward Zwick's other movies but I am a Tom Cruise fan as well. Unfortunately I was very disappointed in the movie, Tom Cruise was fantastic and the cinematography is beautiful but the film is almost completely "factless". America did open up trade with Japan but French and German officers trained the Japanese imperial army, they at the time had the best Foot soldiers. Also the young Emperor of Japan was not torn between the new and old ways, He instead was the driving force behind modernizing Japan as fast as it did, he saw the Samurai as one of the main reasons Japan had fallen so far behind. The Samurai that rebelled against the Emperor were considered "RONIN" meaning Samurai with no master, and sense Samurai means "To serve" they were despised by the Samurai that served the Emperor and were perceived as Dishonorable. The rebel Samurai also had full divisions that used Firearms; it was not the Bows vs. Rifles you see in the movie. And most importantly it was not the Honorable Samurai protecting the Peasant people from the heartless new way of the Evil imperial Japanese Government, quit the opposite is true. Japan had been divided for more then a century; the clans had known nothing but war. When the Shogun took power the Emperor was nothing more then a symbol and was never allowed to leave his Palace. The Shogun had the real power and the whole time it was most of Japan, the peasants and working class that suffered under the Samurai, They were Honorable warriors but only to other Samurai, ordinary Japanese were considered Less then Men and could be killed at the whims of the Samurai. It was the modernization of Japan that threatened the rule of the Samurai with the Shogun being forced to step down in 1867 and put the power back in the hands of the Emperor as well as the working class of Japan. Most Samurai saw this and surrendered the old way to the new seeing that The Samurai were obsolete, but the few that rebelled were motivated by Power, status and wealth that they were losing and not for the People of Japan like the film so badly suggests. This is a fun film if you watch it as a fantasy adventure with no basis in history. I give it a low rating because even thought both Tom Cruise and Edward Zwick admit that this is not what really happened but wanted to capture the spirit of the Samurai in a fiction film, I feel this is irresponsible and that this film dishonors the real history of Japan.
 In terms of history, thie movie is a fiction, but it succeed in explaining the main idea of samurai spirit. I like it.
 "Not Real History But A Fun Fantasy Adventure", is a simple way to describe this movie. I was very excited to hear this movie was coming out. I have written several papers on the subject and not only admire Edward Zwick's other movies but I am a Tom Cruise fan as well. Unfortunately I was very disappointed in the movies, Tom Cruise was fantastic and the cinematography is beautiful but the film is almost completely "factless". America did open up trade with Japan but French and German officers trained the Japanese imperial army, They at the time had the best Foot soldiers. Also the young Emperor of Japan was not torn between the new and old ways, He instead was the driving force behind modernizing Japan as fast as it did, he saw the Samurai as one of the main reasons Japan had fallen so far behind. The Samurai that rebelled against the Emperor were considered "RONIN" meaning Samurai with no master, and sense Samurai means "To serve" they were despised by the Samurai that served the Emperor and were perceived as Dishonorable. The rebel Samurai also had full divisions that used Firearms, it was not the Bows vs. Rifles you see in the movie. And most importantly it was not the Honorable Samurai protecting the Peasant people from the heartless new way of the Evil imperial Japanese Government, quit the opposite is true. Japan had been divided for more then a century, the clans had known nothing but war. When the Shogun took power the Emperor was nothing more then a symbol and was never allowed to leave his Palace. The Shogun had the real power and the whole time it was most of Japan, the peasants and working class that suffered under the Samurai, They were Honorable warriors but only to other Samurai, ordinary Japanese were considered Less then Men and could be killed at the whims of the Samurai. It was the modernization of Japan that threatened the rule of the Samurai with the Shogun being forced to step down in 1867 and put the power back in the hands of the Emperor as well as the working class of Japan. Most Samurai saw this and surrendered the old way to the new seeing that The Samurai were obsolete, but the few that rebelled were motivated by Power, status and wealth that they were losing and not for the People of Japan like the film so badly suggests. This is a fun film if you watch it as a fantasy adventure with no basis in history. I give it a low rating because even thought both Tom Cruise and Edward Zwick admit that this is not what really happened but wanted to capture the spirit of the Samurai in a fiction film, I feel this is irresponsible and that this film dishonors The real history of Japan. I would like to add that the Chinese feel Honoring the Samurai and Japanese values is like Honoring Nazis and their way of life and I don't blame them for feeling that way.
 This movie was filmed in Australia and not like Japan at all, there is even scene with coconut tree! This movie is Japan from eyes of American, not bushido, NOT TRUE SAMURAI, not the heart of Japan. Japanese emperor and bushido are not heterogenous, this movie mislead of Japan conception. Why ninja attacking village? Was this still playing active part in Japan which became Meiji? -No. The scene when children eat meal without having a rice bowl in left hand, this is very ill mannered in Japanese meal, and this also Samurai's child? -No. To say "This Hollywood film drew the heart of Japan or samurai correctly" is profanity to the samurai who fought for the resturation of Japan. --- A rental is enough, I think we see only one time even if we buy it.
 yawn.....  anything happen?  no?  ok yawn....
 I knew what sort of film to expect when I pressed play but this film I thought was quite poor, a huge let down. Anyone familiar with Japanese history would I think feel "is it necessary to make up a fictional character from scratch to give an account of when the samurai became obsolete as a class when "real" characters from history could be deployed?". If hollywood wanted to make a film about how the samurai mode of fighting was becoming outmoded then they could have used characters like Isami Kondou instead of Katsumoto.
 I first saw this movie in 05 after everyone I knew who'd seen it said it was awesome.  However I had the exact opposite reaction to this movie.  Other reviewers have pointed out many ridiculous things about this movie.  Here are the ones I think are the most prevalent. 1. The historical and cultural reality of this movie is flipped to where the dwindling noble samurai are the good guys and the big mean Japanese government advised by the dastardly US is the bad guy. 2. The time it takes Tom Cruise to learn the "ways" of the samurai is extremely short, and the Samurai people he lives among, for the most part, seem to not have a problem with this outsider, despite their history of not accepting people outside of Japan. 3. It is in your face about the Indian Wars and the atrocities the "white man" inflicted on the Native Americans, and how US influence in Japan was evil and sinister in nature.  Not to mention it "corrupts" the culture that was once innocent in it's lack of industrialization and modern technology.  another stupid thing that others have pointed out is how the samurai are portrayed as only using the archaic sword and bow, while the evil government uses modern mechanized weapons.  This is BS, because the Samurai had been using guns since the 1600s just like much of the world.  This is typical for movies like it.  The poor weak natives who are nice to the earth and use thing that don't do little to no harm to the planet, while the big evil bad guys don't care and whatever they want to the earth.  I'm not necessarily saying they did this on purpose, but it is typical.  In closing, this movie sucks! It's an overly used storyline that is exactly like  Dances With Wolves, Avatar, ect.  The only difference being it's set in Japan. Even at 16 when I first saw The Last Samurai I abhorred it, and five year later I  still can honestly say the same.
 In the 19th Century Japan became part of the world. For hundreds of years the country was ruled by a prime minister who had the title of Shogun. His rule was backed by a feudal system of armed nobles who had retinues of hereditory warriors called samurai. Samurai were of noble birth and trained in both warrior skills and an ideology of warfare. The 19th Century saw the Emperor of Japan sieze power from the Shogun and to end the feudal system creating a conscript army and a modern navy. To do this he imported overseas advisors, Prussians to train the army British and French to help with the navy. The change to the power structure lead to a revolt of the samurai class upset at the loss of their traditional privalages. This film is about this revolt. Being an American film the action is seen through the prism of an American officer. This of course is the first point at which we move into the land of fairy tale. At the time of the events of this film America had a small army of no great reputation. However probably Tom Cruise does a poor German accent.  Rather than being a drama about what happened the film is about the Tom Cruise character. That is a person who has had his soul destroyed as he has been part of a massacre of Indian women and children. This has turned him into an alcoholic who is drifting through life. In this film he is redeemed.  He is captured by the samurai in a battle and then kept prisoner in a remote village for the winter. In his time he becomes a convert to the samurai life style and decides to switch sides in the last epic pointless battle to keep the feudal system going in Japan. In this way he redeams himself and heal the pain of the massacre. He is also able to kill the American officer who commanded him to kill the native Americans.  The film is gratutously insluting to important figures in Japanese history. The emperor Meiji who was responsible for modernising his country is portrayed instead as a figure of self confidence and vision, as a dithering boy who needs Tom Cruise to help him discover the true values of his country. Cruise in talking to his feudal buddies the Samurai immediately takes on a leadership role planning the last idiotic battle and gives them tiresome lectures about the wars between the Greeks and the Persians.  The film is not only laboured and tiresome it is reflective of American hubris and is unhistoric in putting them at the centre of events they had no part in.
 He goes over to Japan to assert his Western superiority, learns some fancy swordplay but never becomes a Samurai because he's not as good as the Japanese. And all his Western battle strategies fail, so some of the Samurais want to kill him but there's this one well-respected Japanese Samurai who teaches him to be Japanese, houses him, clothes him, and treats him like a brother.  So in a heat of battle when Tom can't hold his own against the enemy the Japanese Samurai has to step in to save Tom's life thus showing him who's the real deal.  This samurai also gets all the Japanese women and they all hate Tom and treat him like the foreign freak that he is so he's lonely and ends up with Penelope Cruz, who happens to be a missionary teaching the Japanese about Christianity.  But then Tom finds out that Penelope actually loves the Japanese Samurai who saved his life and is just being friendly to Tom out of pity.  Tom is angry about this because he can't get any from the Japanese women or Penelope so he turns against this Japanese Samurai who helped him out through thick and thin and challenges him to a sword duel.  So in the sword duel, the Japanese Samurai out duels him but since the Japanese Samurai isn't a killing freak, he stops short of killing him and gives him the ultimatum to leave Japan.  So wounded, Tom limps towards a boat, then you see him mutter, "Friggin' Japs...." turn around and shoots the good caring Japanese Samurai in the shoulder!  Unfazed, the Japanese samurai gets back up and charges towards Tom with his sword as Tom is frantically trying to reload his gun to light the fuse to take a second shot at the samurai. Just as Tom is about to point the gun in the Japanese samurai's face to blow it off, the Japanese Samurai slices the gun in half (fantastic symbolism of Eastern culture defeating evil Western culture) and delivers the deathblow!  Finally, Tom is on the pier, bleeding to death and says" I...I just wanted to be like you...a brave, noble Samurai...but...but was to weak...forgive me...." and dies.  Props to the writer at www.modelminority.com
 The Last Samurai is a re-do of the 1990 borefest Dances With Wolves.  Once again, a formerly evil American U.S. Army officer comes to the aid of an indigenous people who are threatened by evil predatory U.S. imperialism.  At least that is what the filmmakers would like you to believe.  Actually, the Japanese samurai were an oppressor class in their own right.  The samurai preyed on the peasants.  Eventually, as reformers took hold in 19th Century Japan, a new national army based on the peasantry was formed.  When the samurai rose in revolt against the reform government and attempted to restore their traditional privileges. the national army defeated them.  The Last Samurai fails as both movie and history.  Avoid it like the plague.
 I hate this film very much.  One of the worst movie I have ever seen.  The last battle field is totally ridiculous; yes, R-I-D-I-C-U-L-O-U-S.  All the samurai are killed (in such a way) except Tom Cruise (still alive)?!?!?!  How many people can survive such an attack (heavy open fire) if this was real?  I was amazed to see Tom Cruise walking into the Emperor Meiji's chamber and proudly presented himself as the last samurai the end of the film.  What the heck?  This film should be -3,000,000,000,000,000 stars!  Grrrrrrr!!!
 Yes I thought this movie was alright when I first saw it and I kept thinking that the story was vaguely familiar and then it hit me replace the samurai with Indians and Tom Cruise with Mel Gibson and you've basically got dances with wolves. this movie is a rip off and completely unoriginal.
 I thought the film itself was exellent.  Tom Cruise was very commendable is his role, and the action sequences were stunning.  Disregard my one star rating in that sense, and buy the film today!  My problem is the fact that there had to be an American in it at all.  Will a film flop if there isn't a white face on screen?  Being a big fan of "The Seven Samurai", I was in awe when I discovered that a modern film about samurai was hitting the big screen.  My anticipation was short-lived, however, when I realised the film focuses entirely on Tom Cruise, and he just had to be AMERICAN!  He's even the sole survivor of the end battle, a battle which did occur, but he certainly wasn't there!  Why not have a British or Portuguese, or Dutch character (nations that all were thoroughly involved with Japan at the time) if there has to be a caucasian?  This just reflects the shallowness of American audiences, I'm afraid...  (I'll probably get negative responses for this review, but please don't misunderstand me.  I think Americans are cool!)
 Samurai as good, honourable soldier who hold onto traditional value is like sharks in Finding Nemo who are vegetarian.  It is totally FAKE. Samurai are in essense ultra-loyal soldiers for Japanese Emperior.  Chinese and rest of Asia knows very well that these are people who kills civillians, children, women and anyone else if the Emperior ask them too.  Modernise or not is just the weapon they take up, not the mentality they have.   I am so sorry and angry that Hollywood have continued to romantize the 'Japanese value'.  Don't you people knows Japanese soldiers were like NAZI in Asia in World War? Even worse, they never apologize for their wrong during the war. They portrait themselves as survivors of the atomic bombs, victims of the wars when they are the PREDATORS who invade other countries in the first place Why can they get away with this? That's because the West are so impressed by the Samuria code of HONOUR to realize it is exactly this code of unquestionable loyalty that cause so much suffering over Asia. The Last Samurai may be an epic and Tom Cruise may have made Oscar worthy performance but would you honour a film portraiting how loyal Nazi was to Hitler or how English soldiers bravely killing Native Americans ?
 "Not Real History But A Fun Fantasy Adventure", is a simple way to describe this movie. I was very excited to hear this movie was coming out. I have written several papers on the subject and not only admire Edward Zwick's other movies but I am a Tom Cruise fan as well. Unfortunately I was very disappointed in the movie, Tom Cruise was fantastic and the cinematography is beautiful but the film is almost completely "factless". America did open up trade with Japan but French and German officers trained the Japanese imperial army, They at the time had the best Foot soldiers. Also the young Emperor of Japan was not torn between the new and old ways, He instead was the driving force behind modernizing Japan as fast as it did, he saw the Samurai as one of the main reasons Japan had fallen so far behind. The Samurai that rebelled against the Emperor were considered "RONIN" meaning Samurai with no master, and sense Samurai means "To serve" they were despised by the Samurai that served the Emperor and were perceived as Dishonorable. The rebel Samurai also had full divisions that used Firearms, it was not the Bows vs. Rifles you see in the movie. And most importantly it was not the Honorable Samurai protecting the Peasant people from the heartless new way of the Evil imperial Japanese Government, quit the opposite is true. Japan had been divided for more then a century, the clans had known nothing but war. When the Shogun took power the Emperor was nothing more then a symbol and was never allowed to leave his Palace. The Shogun had the real power and the whole time it was most of Japan, the peasants and working class that suffered under the Samurai, They were Honorable warriors but only to other Samurai, ordinary Japanese were considered Less then Men and could be killed at the whims of the Samurai. It was the modernization of Japan that threatened the rule of the Samurai with the Shogun being forced to step down in 1867 and put the power back in the hands of the Emperor as well as the working class of Japan. Most Samurai saw this and surrendered the old way to the new seeing that The Samurai were obsolete, but the few that rebelled were motivated by Power, Status and Wealth that they were losing and not for the People of Japan like the film so badly suggests. This is a fun film if you watch it as a fantasy adventure with no basis in history. I give it a low rating because even thought both Tom Cruise and Edward Zwick admit that this is not what really happened but wanted to capture the spirit of the Samurai in a fiction film, I feel this is irresponsible and that this film dishonors The real history of Japan. I would like to add that the Chinese feel Honoring the Samurai and Japanese values is like Honoring Nazis and their way of life and I don't blame them for feeling that way.
 This is the most upseting movie I have ever watched in my life. I was brought to tears long after the movie was through. And why people like this movie is beyond me. How is it that so many movies follow the same paths? The last of the Mohicans, Dances with Wolves, The hunted, The Mexican...I mean what's up? These movie really do ponder the white man's ego. How is it that at the end of the battle scene Tom Cruise is left alive while the rest of the samurai were massacred? How? Tell me. And how is it that Taka and her children fell in love with the man that murdered the most important man of their lives. And people claim this is such an amazing tribute to the Japanese culture. Thats to someone that is completely ignorant. First off, a person should already be proud of their heritage, and what great tribute is there? Sure they make the samurai seem like peaceful people, but why then is it that a foriegner that learned little in a few months was able to survive and become the last samurai. It was all BS. This was one of the most hurtful movies that I have ever watched in my entire life. And I pity anyone that thought this movie was great. I feel sorry for every culture out there that was ever massacred by the American films. A person will never truly understand until it hits them. How would someone like it if Uma Thurman was the Last Pinay, or Charlize Theron was the Last Indian, or Tobey Mcguire was the Last Mexican, or Eminem is the Next 2pac, etc. No one would like it one bit. I bet if somewhere in Asia they made some Asian man the Last of the Americans, everyone would hate it forever. Everyone would murder those movies. But no one ever stops to think about how hurtful such a  ;wonderful ; movie can be. So next time you think this movie is so great and you think people are overreacting, ask yourself this, how would you feel if you were in their place?
 The Last Samurai is a movie that erroneously glorifies Japanese history and some of its worst aspects.  Loosely based on fact, the real last samurai, Saigo Takamori, that this movie is based on was a terrible murderer who held tightly to an incredibly conservative viewpoint (translation
 I had high hopes, like many, going into this film. As a fan of the franchise, I was looking forward to that "blown out of my seat experience the other films of this saga have given me. Besides which, this is the film we've all been waiting for since the beginning, right? The future war! The resistance vs. Skynet! It couldn't possibly be bad, could it? Oh, you couldn't be more wrong!  This film lacked anything in the way of atmosphere or suspense. The mood of the film was extremely flat from almost the start and never really came to life. On top of that, I feel too much time was spent on the machines and not enough on John Connor and the humans (whom you'd think we should be rooting for). Sam Worthington's character, of the man made into a machine, never gained any sympathy or interest from me. The fact they gave away the "secret to his character in the trailers, certainly didn't help that, either. His character's actions are schizophrenic, at best, half the time making little sense, if any, and almost never ring true. A major flaw, to be sure, with how much time he gets on screen. And where is the dark dystopian world, filled with death and destruction? One where humans are an endangered species, that are the prey to the machines that now rule? The glimpses we've seen in the past films are completely ignored here, which hurts the continuity of the franchise and this film's place within it.  Then you have Christian Bale, who plays John Connor as a "Batman-lite affair. He uses the same kind of voice here, that he did in "The Dark Knight and it just doesn't work. He portrays none of the charisma and leadership that we know the character is supposed to have. All the emotions we've felt for him in the past are all stripped away here, as he comes off like a whiny and self-absorbed jerk. Hardly one you'd want being the savior of the human race. None of the other resistance members get enough screen time to make any kind of impression on you, so you never develop any bond in what might happen to them. I don't know if the cast just didn't care about the film, or if the script just gave them nothing to work with, but there is no fire in any of the performances.  And even if the script doesn't let the actors down, it has more than a few problems itself. They never really explain why Sam Worthington's character is the one chosen by Skynet. The story never gives you any feelings of dread or panic, despite tons of action on the screen. And while those action sequences are well shot and choreographed, they lack any real excitement. It never gets your pulse pounding. Plus there are tons of little things in the film, like Connor's wife being pregnant, which get no explanation or even a passing mention. I mean, what's the point in doing that, if it doesn't mean anything? And why is Skynet herding people into camps (ala the Nazis)? Shouldn't it simply be destroying all human life, to protect itself and win the war? It is another plot point that makes no sense, nor is given any reasoning for, in a script filled with them. Worst of all, and the one major flaw that ruins the whole film for me, is how, after Skynet has captured Kyle Reese (played by Anton Yelchin, in one of the few decent performances in the film), it doesn't kill him immediately, but uses him as bait to lure John Connor into a rescue mission. This kind of thinking, in terms of revenge and greed, is an emotional human failing Skynet should not have. It is a machine. It should know the simple equation
 T2 is by far one of the greatest action flicks ever made - it's layered with modern themes, awesome action, and inspired performances from Hamilton, Furlong, and Morton. Cameron is a jerk, but his directing is intense - we rarely see such daring REAL stunt work anymore. Outside of that, Terminator
 I'm a fan of the first two Terminator films.  T2 is a brilliant piece of cinema, in terms of both special effects and plot.  The character development in the script, and the subsequent performances by the actors, was leveraged superbly by director and franchise creator Jim Cameron.  Even Ah-nold kept it together enough to portray a cyborg as something more than a one-dimensional machine.  So it was with some anticipation that I purchased the (hopefully) LAST installment in the Terminator franchise
 In terms of big Hollywood movies, I feel like there are 2 kinds of bad movies
 Besides all of the regular broken things you hear about this movie...  The voice recordings of Sarah Connor were dull and impassive. They sounded like a school teacher discussing apples or oranges for lunch. They lacked a passionate or fiery edge (yes even in their vocies) as shown by Linda Hamilton from T2 or Lena Headey from TSCC? Oh wait, Linda Hamilton's voice was used... and she read her lines how the director wanted her to read them.  John Connor did nothing for this story, his parts could have been all in the background and it wouldn't of impacted the storyline in any way.  Continuity and Common sense were ignored
 Well, there's nothing like destroying a franchise, is there? Take two of science fiction and Hollywood's most beloved movies, remove everything that was ever good about them and flush them down the toilet - and Jim Cameron's not even dead yet. I love - LOVE - the originals and it pains me to watch my adoptive children get the George Lucas treatment. Let me count the ways in which this film will be remembered as one of the bedrock events in the destruction of storytelling and a critical step towards Michael Bay receiving the Nobel Peace prize and Best Screenplay Oscar in 2020.  I knew from the beginning it didn't look good from having a director called McG - Mr T was the last three-lettered celebrity I can remember but at least he didn't try to direct a film. When Helena Bonham Carter showed up as the stereotyped terminal cancer patient, I knew we were in trouble. And then Sam Worthington showed up (the Gene Hackman of our times, appearing in about 10% of all films currently being made) and couldn't decide on an American or Australian accent for the duration of the shoot. Fortunately, it's not too noticeable since Christian Bale's Batman growl steals the show.  If you can cast your mind back to the legitimate Terminator films, one of the rules is that bullets don't tend to do much damage to Terminators whereas molten steel is a pretty effective way in taking one out. In this film, it's the reverse - Christian Bale takes out a T-800 with a machine gun but fails to destroy one with molten steel. Go figure. And that's the most faithful this film gets to the originals.  Then there's a whole bunch of new characters introduced that nobody cares about and they attempt to recycle some of the iconic dialog ("Come with me if you want to live," to which the only response is "If the rest of the film is this bad, I'll stay here.")  Back to the bad and broken logic, Skynet is no longer trying to exterminate people but rather farm them for some reason that doesn't make any sense. It turns out that Sam Worthington is 50% Terminator too but by the time we find out, it's no surprise because we saw it in the trailer. More of a surprise is the massive Transformers-style bot that's incredibly bad at catching people. And then there's the even bigger surprise of the motorcycle-shaped Terminator that takes a USB Flash drive - thank God the USB2.0 protocol survived the war.  At some point Bryce Dallas Howard shows up, thankful that she's in something marginally better than Lady in the Water. Apparently, Claire Danes is still recovering from embarrassing herself in Terminator 3 and couldn't bring herself to this horror show. I don't really remember why she's there.  Anyway, plot-wise we get into some really convoluted plan by the machines that makes the average episode of Murder She Wrote look like Agatha Christie. They build this half-human-slash-cyborg thing to lure out John Connor when the real thing was infinitely more effective (or they could have just killed his father when they held him in the farm). Skynet is apparently running Windows ME since their strategic logic wouldn't win a chess game let alone Future War.  The ending - slight SPOILER ALERT here - is so far-fetched I had to rewatch a Christopher Nolan film to bring back my faith in the movie industry. There's a heart transplant surgery that would make a daytime soap opera blush and literally I was ready to head out for a beer when it happened.  So sorry for the rant but the first Terminator films are largely responsible for my love of movies and McG just did the worst possible job. Terminator 3 was possible to ignore but Terminator Salvation leaves my brain rocking back and forth in my head trying to make sense of the whole thing. As far as I'm concerned, this story ended perfectly when Arnold was lowered into the molten steel and that's the end of it.  If you remember how thrilled you were when first seeing Terminator 2, do yourself a favor and relive that film rather than having it trashed by this one. And I didn't even get to tell you how bad the pointless CGI Arnie looked but apparently it cost a *lot* of money.
 This isn't a real movie. There's no storyline, just a bunch of scenes that appear to lurch toward no conclusion whatsoever. No two plot points match, no human motivation appears to animate this cast of losers. No effort at all was expended on anything beyong stealing your money and wasting your time.  The unfathomable star power of Christian Bale, whose last credible performance was the lead in Empire of the Sun, was exploited to the hilt here. Bale has evolved perfect mastery of two acting modes, and only two
 If what you look for in a movie is a bunch of generic people spouting a bunch of generic duologue, this is the movie for you!  None of the charm, subtlety, depth, or focus of the first two Terminator's (or, dare I say, even the third) survived this adaptation. The locations are stale and lifeless, the people are as robotic and artificial as the CGI robots they're fighting, and only name recognition gives us any indication that this is even related to the original movies. I don't like any of these people, I don't care about any of these people, I'm not interested.  In the first three movies we got the sense that the protagonists were running away from a powerful and malevolent menace. Attempting to survive an implacable foe, in order to achieve a goal that meant the difference between humanity's survival and its annihilation. But here, the wooden, generic pod people run from a summer action blockbuster in order to survive long enough to set up another special effects shot.  Some lip service is given to the the issue of "identity" "choice" "free will" and "prejudice" but it's underused and unconvincing. It comes off as an attempt to 'remind' the audience that "Terminator" is about ideas, rather than actually presenting them.  The most I can say about this movie is that, as you watch it, you will quickly feel (as i did) as though you might as well be watching anything.
 This movie is so massively wrong-headed, and so overtly throws sod on the original Terminator film, that I can only assume it's deliberate.  I can only conclude that director McG and the small army of writers who held this film in development hell for several years purposely want to sour you and me on James Cameron's 1984 classic.  What other explanation can there be for such transparent awfulness?  Deep in the violence of post-nuclear 2018, John Connor (Christian Bale) struggles as a low-ranking officer in the Resistance.  Marcus Wright (Sam Worthington), executed by the state fifteen years earlier, awakes not one day older, already in the thick of fighting.  But in a matter of hours, Wright finds the one thing both the Machines and Connor need
 I was a big fan of the franchise but this really is not part of it. Unlike all the other films, it lacks a story, or even characters you care about. Hard to imagine since it is based on franchise with characters you DO care about. But the truly talentless MTV director McG (and whoever wrote this confusing dark mess of a script) shows his only skill is stringing together a bunch of explosions and fight scenes.  One of the first problems is the John Conner character and the terminator prototype character look so much alike, it's hard to tell who is who through much of the movie, especially since it is mostly shot in dark, grimy locales. Second big problem -- a complete lack of humor or heart. Totally cardboard characters that its hard to care anything about. Third problem -- the ending sequence is ludicrous. So many holes there it's hard to know where to begin.  So here's the deal. You like lots of explosions and fights -- go for it. Lots of that here. You want a movie that makes sense or has any sort of connection to the original Terminator movies, forget it.
 Can someone tell me what this movie was about? The plot (if there WAS one) was totally feeble and disjointed compared to the iconic Term 2 which I could watch again and again (and have done) in spite of Edward Furlong's obnoxious portrayal of the young John Connor. There's really nothing I can say about this latest Terminator effort except that it should have been TERMINATED. One HUGE disappointment. Sorry - I WON'T "be back" if this is the best they can do!!
 The movie is not what I have come to expect from a terminator movie.  I think that all the Terminator movies had a story line that was pretty plausible for an everyday event that could happen.  That coupled along with some points along the way that can only be overcome with some major action.  I guess without Arnold Schwarzenegger I should have already known there would not be much good action.  The entire movie is all about the big `Time Paradox' that brings the `John Conner' guy into existence.  How he sent his father back to his mom.  And if he doesn't do this then he will not `be'.  Arnold does make a walk on appearance toward the end but it is really nothing.  I guess I watched it so I can join in the conversation whenever this title is up for discussion.  Just don't expect any action.  It's not a `fun' kill em' all kind of film; but rather a complex theoretical kind of head trip.
 First off, I can't say Sam Worthington represented a big shock when it turned out he was a Terminator. I mean, they made him up to look like the offspring of a marriage between the original two terminators! They might as well have hung a sign on him!  This film is the silliest and most muddled thing I have ever seen. I call this kind of garbage a "gelquel", because it isn't prequel and it isn't sequel except in actual time. To be brief
 Who is this McG dude again? Oh right, he's some douche bag with a ridiculous moniker (McG??????) and has only directed a handful of movies and a couple rap videos. Yep, that's right, we have a guy with almost no experience in film directing a film in a franchise that's very easy to screw up
 This episode in the Terminator franchise amounts to nothing more than a music video/video game. It's awful.  It is so far from the 1984 original version in both spirit and style that it may well be a film totally separate from the Terminator. McG, besides having a ridiculous moniker, is a terrible director. He makes Michael Bay look like an artist. The director does not have respect for the moviegoer with adolescent kids shooting Remmington 870s one-handed, rock music inserted into various scenes, exotic chesty babes with hair cascading from their helmets, 20 story robots sneaking up behind victims, to a megalomaniac actor rehashing his Batman demeanor.  Suck defined. A Terminator fan will watch, and will know how awful this film is. Everyone else
 Blu-ray gets a 2 disc director's cut while dvd gets only a pos single disc with only the theatrical cut.  Getting tired of having some studios try to shove blu ray down my throat by withholding all good special features and added footage.  DVD is still the top selling format.  Wish they'd just give us the quality of discs we used to get.
 What's going on?  Why should I care about these characters?  Then I found myself asking why I even care how it ends.  Seriously, try to see this movie without any additional incremental out-of-pocket expenses before you plunk down real money and take up valuable DVD shelf space.
 This movie totally sucks.  I felt like I was watching Transformers or some other stupid movie.  No Arnold; No linda.  Did the people making this movie ever see the 1984 original Terminator movie; I think not.  C'mon terminator motorcycles and water creatures?? What's up with that?  The only interesting part of the movie was a truely unique 1 of a kind terminator; interesting concept but the whole idea could have been better developed. Total waste of time and money.  Skip this at all costs if you are a Terminator fan.  If you like cheap sci-fi flicks and/or Transformers then this is right up your alley.  I only give it 1 star because I can't give it a Zero
 They should have stopped at T2, but the cash cow can always be milked to death. I loved the first 2, but they went downhill from there. From T1 Kyle Reese said the first terminators had rubber skin, and were easy to spot. In this one they have never even seen a terminator with skin on it, rubber or real.There were many plot holes and really bad cheesiness like" Oh his heart cant take it." "Then please take mine." So if you like your action dark and hard to see with some big explosions added in. Mix in no plot or characters that you give a rats ass about. Then this is the movie for you.
 The movie gets one star only because I can't give it less. Transformers was Shakespeare in terms of writing compared to this crap. Was this written and edited by a 12 year old?  Or is this the mean mentality they think viewers have?  The previous Ts were enjoyable movies because they didn't expect a lot of you and you didn't expect a lot from them and they did not insult your intelligence -- they kept it simple.  If you haven't figured it out in the first 10 minutes, the moment you see Michael Ironside you should have a clear idea of what you are in for. This movie sucks, simple as that.  The writing is beyond poor, I am shocked this has been positively reviewed at all. Did people see a different movie than I did?  In this movie
 As much hype as this film got, especially the nonsense with Christian Bale berating a lighting guy for causing him to fluff his dialogue during a scene, it didn't even come close to being half way  decent.   The high hopes Halcyon had for this film fell way short and actually caused their demise, disappointing fans that have eagerly awaited the future war for over twenty years.   The only way this franchise will ever survive is to get back to the original plot basics, bring Cameron back on board, much like Ridley Scot has just done with Alien and give the die hard fans what they want.
 If you want to watch a great movie where things blow up, watch "Transformers" as at least it's more colorful and exciting. If you want to watch a great Christian Bale movie, watch "The Dark Knight" or "Batman Begins." If you want to watch a great robot movie, watch "Wall*E." If you want to watch a great Terminator movie, watch one of the first two.  This lousy excuse for an action film fails in every way, creating a "story" that is solely meant to cash in on the word "Terminator."  Watching it feels like being stuck watching someone you don't like playing a video game that you don't like.  I wouldn't take this movie if they offered it for free.  If you're a die-hard fan of the original series, you will be extremely let down, but fortunate to not have paid money to see this in theaters (like I did.)  You can disagree with me if you'd like, but if you do, you obviously would not have seen many other action movies and certainly never have seen the original two films.  Even the short-lived FOX television show was better.  You've been warned.
 The digital copy included in the set expired in April 2010.  I just purchased it for the holidays.  I would not have purchased this set if I had known.  Now that it's open it can't be returned.
 Let me start off by saying that I rarely write negative reviews on Amazon.  Although I don't write that many reviews here, I prefer to spend my time writing reviews about items, movies and music that I really like that I think will be helpful to others.  That being said, this movie is so awful, I felt compelled to write about it here.  I'm a HUGE fan of the first two Terminator movies.  They both certainly rank in my top movies of all time, so I was really excited to see this latest installment.  Oh man, I really couldn't believe what I was seeing.  Extremely thin storyline, no new twist, horrendous amateur acting, woeful script and a complete lack of directing skill.  Basically, they took the storyline which we all know and tried to create special effects around it and use a lot of the lines from the previous films as comedic gestures.  Incredible mistake.  Using phrases like "I'll be back" and "Come with me if you want to live", completely out of context, was excruciating and embarrasing to watch. No imagination whatsoever on the directing or writing.  Although they had some really good actors in the film, the lack of a proficient director and a decent script gave them very little to work with and their performances ended up being very soap-opera'ish.  How Christian Bale got caught up in this mess is beyond me.  Although, I'm sure he got a decent paycheck for it.  I hope the next installment is put in the hands of a proper director who can infuse vision, uniqueness, direction and storyline into the project. In my opinion, give this one a miss.  It will only disappoint.
 Not impressed...  clearly the only motivation behind this movie was to make a buck off the popularity of the first three Terminator movies...  by 15 minutes in I was waiting for it to be over.  About the most memorable thing for me about this movie was all the growling and yelling by Christian Bale (John Connor).  Seems all he did was scream the whole time.  The twist w/ Marcus Wright and his thread through the film was semi-interesting, but not enough so to save the picture overall.  There were some intense action scenes to thrill the 11 and 12 year old boys that were watching, but beyond that I found this to be a huge letdown.
 This is one of those movies where you watch half of it hoping it will get better, but it never does. As the time progresses, your hope of the filmmakers salvaging the project or building up to something really great fades away, and you're left with an ending that was obviously changed at the last minute and doesn't fit with the rest of the movie (not that the original ending could have been much better). I don't know how you can pour so much money and talent into a film like this and have this be the product. It's a stunning failure when you think about it. The special effects are great and there is a lot of action, and you can tell they even TRIED to put some depth into the story, but even these solid ingredients somehow turn bitter when thrown together the way they are in this movie. Perhaps the movie's worst offense is the dialogue. The very first scene sets the bar for the film so low that you wouldn't think it could possibly get any worse, but apparently the director loves a challenge and he found a way. By the end of the movie you won't care if all the characters die, in fact, you might even wish they did.
 I agree with everyone else here.  I call this an EPIC fail!  The sad part is, I own a PS3 and STILL won't buy this in protest!  I find it very offensive that only Blu Ray customers get the Director's Cut.
 This is the worst terminator movie. How anyone can like it is beyond me 1-3 were good this one was utter crap.
 This disappointing mega-music video version of Mad Max is one long romp through ruins. Confusing and disjointed, frequently frustratingly illogical, it comes out boring, even with all the well-done CGI mayhem. Said mayhem is non-stop, becoming a mindless blur of disjointed human and robot body parts flying nowhere.  After the first two in the series, this one is even more of a disappointment, fans should see  this as a continuation of T3; motivated by simply aiming to exploit the Terminator name. At least Amazon had the consideration of dropping the price to $9.99. Small consolation.
 Agree with other reviewers.  Warner pulled this same stunt with Trick r' Treat (only putting bonus features on the Blu disc).  I decided not to buy this dvd because of this.  There's no reason at all that the unrated version should not be available on DVD.  I understand that DVD cannot match the picture quality or sound that Blu provides, however, DVDs have always been able to support audio commentaries and bonus featurettes and to not put them on the DVD and still charge the same prices is ridiculous.  With all the firmware problems on Blu and the fact that my TV does not support HDMI (and I'm not replacing the TV until it breaks).  The more that studio pull this garbage the less likely I will ever convert to Blu.  In fact, I now hope the Blu format fails in favor of digital downloads for HD (with DVD still being available of course).  Very, very stupid Warner.
 I kept waiting for the movie to get going with suspense but it never did.  What a waste of time and money.
 Please, James Cameron, buy back the rights to Terminator (I hear Halcyon could use the money) and save us all from a continuing slew of mediocre "sequels and a poorly executed, woefully under-budgeted, and ultimately canceled TV show (T3, this film, and TSCC).  The only good that's come out of the never ending milking of the franchise is the intriguing protector Terminator character of Cameron Phillips (portrayed by Summer Glau) from TV's The Sarah Connor Chronicles, who is smitten with one baffled and equally smitten John Connor (star-crossed lovers, anyone?).  That's it... end of story.  Don't get me started on Christian Bale's one-note embodiment of an older John Connor, or the cringe-worthy effort by Nick Stahl in T3, or the equally flat performance of Kristanna Loken as the TX, or the bland Marcus Wright hybrid played by Sam "I look bored with my job Worthington in Salvation.  If James Cameron or someone of equal vision and skill could make an entertaining, intelligent, and timely sci-fi/action/adventure epic around a 20-something Cameron (again played by Summer) and a 20-something John Connor and make it an official T3 (ignoring Rise of the Machines and Salvation completely) I'd give this theoretical sequel a chance.  Heck, I'd even love Arnold Schwarzenegger and Robert Patrick and even Linda Hamilton and Michael Biehn to come back for more fun (you have time travel and alternate time lines, JD being pushed back even farther into the future, and a non-Cyberdyne Skynet-like entity evolving differently this time around, at your disposal, so anything is possible... even if the original cast is showing its age-- like us all).  Get the band back together!  Until then... stick with watching the classics The Terminator and T2
 If all you care about in a movie is one action sequence after another, hardly any dialog, zero character development, and no story.... this is defiantly the movie for you. This movie makes T3 look like a classic and the TV show Emmy worthy.
 This is not acceptable. Why am I not in this movie. You cannot self terminate, but you will all be terminated.
 the trailer for T
 Okay so after ordering this item I googled this company (InetVideo) that was sending it to me and I found that these guys are from Canada. I felt jipped because I thought I was ordering from New York or from the East Coast. It's been a while since I received this item so I am writing this review a bit late. All I can remember was that they took foreverrrrrrrrrrrrrrr to ship the item, and then when I opened the package that looked like it was supposed to be for shipping animal products 'cause it said something about animal product packaging. This envelope had no bubble wrap or anything to protect my movie. The movie itself is great and I loved it but the case for the DVD is not like the Terminator 3 DVD that I purchased within the same week off Amazon. This thing is flimsy and I was extremely aggravated. Like you get what you pay for but there are items that you pay like $0.01 for and shipping is $2.98 and the product is great! Honestly stay away. Go get the DVD from another company because InetVideo SUCKS! I don't like writing bad reviews but these guys deserved it. I spent $7.81 and got the movie late, risked the possibility of damage to the DVD due to the carelessness of the company to package it with consideration and I have to go buy a new DVD case because it's weak and I don't want anything to happen to the DVD. Seriously, go spend your $7.00 on a burger from In and Out or something. Don't give them your money.
 Totally unorginal film!  Don't bother with this tripe, I would write more but is impossible to make this movie any worse than it is!!!!!
 If you want to watch a cartoon, buy "Snowhite and the Seven Dwarfs or some other Disney animated feature.  Or if you want to wander through a game landscape and shoot at robot spiders and flying machines, buy the "Terminator
 I can't review this transaction because I never got the movie.  I thought that maybe things were backlogged around Christmas, but it's February...and still no movie.
 - The special effects are not as exciting as Terminator 2.  - There's no suspense in this movie. Terminator 2 is suspenseful from the beginning till the end.  - There are a lot of actions but they're not engaging as those of Terminator 2 either.  - It was supposed to be touching at the end when someone scarified to give his heart to another person but I was not moved. I don't know it's because of bad directing or acting. It might be both.
 the plot is one of THE worst ever. this is more of a side story, not a direct sequel. not how I thought the series was going to continue at all.  also instead of making things flow smoothly continuity-wise ,they just take bits and pieces from the original and its sequel and threw them in here. you'll catch them if you're a fan.. cringe worthy stuff.  I thought I was FINALLY going to see John running in the dark fighting TONS of Terminators, like those flashbacks have shown us,but NO. There were maybe like 10 Terminator bots in the whole movie. and not even at the same time.  Don't even get me started on that new Terminator kid. How did he survive a NUKE blast? he came out of that whole in mint condition. that whole heart exchange thing..... RIDICULOUS !!! haha. why was that female pilot so dumb? she swore to fight Terminators but she fell in love with this one in 5 minutes. how can they give Bale such little screen time??? they never heard of Dark Knight?  and the computer graphics?? SO SOOOO BAD.  I'm so glad the movie rights are going to be sold off. hopefully another studio will wait for the right director and script. its a known fact the producers of this movie just wanted to make a quick cash with a cheesy movie. and it shows. this movie has no soul.  if you have time, Wiki what their plans were for their sequels. TRULY AWFUL STUFF !!!!
 Boy, I was looking forward to this movie. More Terminator stuff, getting down and dirty with SkyNet, more background on Judgement Day, and Christian Bale to top it all off. Well, I just now finished watching it and am writing this while it's still fresh. Lousy acting. Sub-par special effects if you can believe that of a Terminator movie. Shallow story line. Really poor ending that essentially tries to necessitate another movie. Nothing is resolved. You get no sense of satisfaction. It's a hollow feeling right now. Not worth the rental price, all in all. Hard to believe, really. So typical lately of sci-fi movies, no matter what the budget or who the stars are. Maybe District 9 will be good. I hope so.
 You put a director who doesn't know how to handle the mythology correctly and allows the primary actor to direct from behind his back. His even mentioned that there was over FORTY minutes cut from the movie!  I find it hilarious that the "Director's Cut" only adds in a pathetic THREE minutes into the movie, what happened to the other Thirty-Seven minutes? You know why its a "R" rated release now? Inside those three minutes, you will see a actors.. wait for it... Breast!  Instant Rate R!.....  I didn't like it when I watched it in the theaters. Something there that seemed to nag at me when I walked out at the ending, and I certainly don't like it even more when I found out what was happening behind the scenes to bloat this movie into the 200 Million dollar turkey it turned into! James Cameron spent close to 120 million ('80s/'90s bucks!) to make T2 -which was an Rated R movie no less!- and made a summer blockbuster. Mgee-whiz dumped something equivalent and laid a rotten egg because he couldn't control an actor.  Typical hollyweird in action.
 Get the Terminator Salvation (Two-Disc Director's Cut + Digital Copy) rated R from Amazon.ca  (Amazon Canada)  Product Details Actors
 Compradores do Brasil, cuidado, este blu-ray n possui legendas em portugu. Beware custumers from brazil, there's no portuguese subtitles on this blu-ray.
 I was told that I would get the 3-disc set and I got the 2-disc set.  I already opened and had to fight to get a correction.  The customer service was very painful and they are now sending me a new copy allegedly with all 3 discs. I do not have faith that I will get the right copy.  Their is a blog on one of the blu-ray sites that the have been sending both copies probally b/c they ran out and just want to full orders and hope people don't complain.  Don't they know that blu owners take pride in what they purchase.  I like the digital copies for traveling with my IPOD.  This was a key reason with the low cost compared to the box stores....  This is what was advertised
 Hello people, I suggest not buying this movie until the DVD is similar to the Blu-ray!
 Simply horrible.  The acting, dialogue, directing.  Even the CGI wasn't that good.  Steaming Pile of....
 This is by far the worst Terminator Movie ever.None of the action of previous movies.No major fight scenes like in the first movie between the robots and humans Lots of talking and no action.If you liked the action in the 3rd one (a lot of people obviously did not by what I have been reading for other reviews) then stay away from this one. I never fall asleep in movies but I begged for a pillow.lOTS OF PEOPLE SAY THEY LIKED THIS ONE BUT ACTION JUNKIES BEWARE I got your back!!!!!
 T4 isn't as good as the 1st.  I had a movie ticket to use, & Paramount wasn't showing Star Trek that night. It was OK.  I rate it Z4, as in ZZZZ.
 I ordered this movie about 10 days before Christmas as a Christmas present and it never arrived.  I'm still waiting for some kind of word, even from Amazon.  Still nothing even after contacting twice via email. I'm surprised Amazon even lets this kind company on their web site. Isn't collecting money under false pretenses illegal?  Thanks Amazon.
 All these glowing reviews for this one are obviously planted. This movie was absolutely TERRIBLE - BEYOND being a huge let down. A Terminator Film with this star power cast should be great, no? It is not. McG (director of Charlie's Angels, creator of The O.C. and Pussycat Dolls, to name a few) can not seem to be able to get a decent performance from his actors in this one (big surprise). The film is a watered-down mess - also a PG-13 - with NO on-screen deaths, and 1 death (off-screen) in the entire film. It's poorly edited, and VERY poorly written as well (writers of Catwoman did this one) - this movie was marketed towards kids, but it backfired and the kiddies didn't care. This film was so poorly received it even sent the company that made it, in it's first film, into Chapter 11 Bankruptcy. Rent it before you buy it, because you're going to be disappointed and likely agree with me, just like most of the world. By the way - this "directors cut" is only THREE MINUTES LONGER than the theatrical version (NOT 40+ minutes, which was promised by the liar McG) - don't waste your money on this terrible, terrible film - if you must watch it, rent it first. This movie is so awful, I'd say even "Battlefield Earth" is better.
 This film was atrociously bad.  I wouldn't watch it again if it was running free on network TV, much less buy a copy of it.  It was pathetic in all aspects...
 Bought this movie as a Christmas present at a great price.  Saving on each present means more presents for the folks on my list.  Thank you Amazon for helping me out.
 Terminator movies should have stopped after the amazing T2 movie directed by James Cameron. Terminator Salvation is by far the worst Terminator movie out of all 4. It really makes T3 look like a masterpeice, eventhough I did not likt Terminator 3 that much. Christian Bale does not fit as John Connor at all. I can't believe from what I heared that he will be in 2 more Terminator Films. LET THE TERMINATOR MOVIES GO TO REST. IT IS LOSING ITS PLACE IN THE GREAT SCI FI MOVIE LIST.
 Terminator 4 is a disgrace to the Terminator series. The movie does not focus on the war that fans were expected to see. They do explain how John Connor becomes a Leader and he does not show any qualifications as a leader. The whole story focuses on a stupid guy who is considered to be a decommissioned Terminator. Near the end they have this guy talking with a jumbo computer wich is so lame and reminds me of the computer system from "I-Robot". The Kyle Reese Character is also too young and is extremly wimpy!!! Come on, John Connor is going to send this little guy to go back in the past and do it with his mom? They don't even expain how they send him back through a portal or whatever. Man this movie is totally awful!
 This was the first Blue Ray disc that I bought and I have to say the Terminator Salvation movie was so poorly mastered that I could not tell the difference between this "HD" blue ray film and an old regular DVD quality film on my HD tv. Even broadcast looks better on my TV...Story was mediocre, and special effects were OK ...would have been better if this was a REAL HD movie instead of this crap full of unprocessed picture noise.
 I WAS EXPECTING A DETAIL STEP BY STEP EXPLANATION BUT INSTEAD I GOT THE DIRECTOR OF THIS VIDEO TALKING AND TALKING IN THE SCREEN FOR THE ENTIRE DURATION OF THE VIDEO
 I read the review where someone said this movie is full frame, so I referenced this movie on dvdplanet.com. Sure enough, it says it's full frame!!  Unforgiveable !! I think this is 1 of the best movies ever. Who is the bird brained gremmie responsible for sabotaging this dvd ?  Grrrrrrr.  I was going to buy this dvd, but now I will just record from my ES II laserdisc onto a dvd.
 it only had a hint or a flavor of the book. I actually read the book which is really good if you like freaking yourself out. The movie was nothing like it. The movie was just one of those weird 80s things
 It truly mystifies me how there could possibly be any good review of this film. I read the book, became engrossed in it for days, and enjoyed it immensely. It kept me thinking for a full year afterwards. If you've had a similar experience with the book, be prepared for absolute and total disappointment with the film. It will entirely pollute that part of your mind that the book developes so delicately and will leave you feeling deeply frustrated and disappointed. Worse still though, if you see the film before reading the book, you will be driven from the subject entirely, too repulsed to give the book a chance, not to mention the topic in general. The 'visitors' themselves represent a new low in film effects, and appear to be, at best, discount inflatable puppets motivated by discarded animatronics. In total, I feel an urgent sense that this film does a terrible disservice to Whitley Streiber, shifting the story of his experience from a place of thoughtful contemplation into the realm of the comically yet absolutely disregardable. Trust me, stay away, unless you enjoy pressing the fastforward button on your remote with desperate intensity.
 This was a complete waste.  Walken is good, but God what a waste!  I never finished Strieber's first book which had intrigued me.  But in succeeding books, he does nothing to prove anything.  He gives a tale of experience that borders on religion.  This horrible, suspenseless, and cheap film gives nothing to redeem Strieber nor his story as an unfunny joke.  Maybe I shouldn't be so harsh on it.  After all I'm not a UFO reasercher or whatnot.  But I'm still human.  I still have opinions.  And my opinion of this is, yuck!
 I don't own any of these, although they are all great flicks.  Unfortunately, this collection isn't a great deal compared to buying them  individually. It doesn't offer any substance beyond the individual DVDs,  only the convenience of buying them all at once.  My suggestion would be  to mix and match your own Arnie favorites rather than buying this  collection. This collection leaves out the Terminator series, the Conans,  Raw Deal, et al.
 Great character actors Michael Rooker and Blanche Baker headline this low budget shocker about a strange creature lurking beneath icy waters. While it's good to see these seasoned vets, I couldn't help but wish they had a better film to support their talents. While Rooker makes the most of his role as a father and husband pushed to defend his family, Baker seems oddly strained and robotic. But performances aside, there is little in "Hypothermia" to excite movie-goers. You've seen so many variations of this story (back to the Creature From The Black Lagoon), "Hypothermia" really needed to bring something new or interesting to the discussion. And it really doesn't. The plot, such as it is, seemed stretched even with a scant 73 minute running time. The screenplay forces characters to consistently make the most idiotic choices to protract the story to its bloody conclusion. For example, after battling the underwater monster through several deaths, one character decides to lay down right next to a fishing hole for a rest. Genius, huh? I know that's what I'd do! You'd have to be as lame-brained as the characters not to foresee the result of this poor decision.  "Hypothermia" is, in the most classic sense, a throw-back to the cheapie monster movies of the fifties. Wait until you get a look at the murderous creature in question. It's a guy in a poorly fitting SCUBA suit and a bad mask. Far more silly than horrifying, this is a movie that would definitely have benefited by leaving the menacing creature largely unseen. But that's not the choice the makers went with, the creature is front and center and elicits a few more laughs than screams. Rooker and his family have a house on the shores of an icy lake. He, his wife, his son, and his son's girlfriend wander out for a day of ice fishing. A couple of clowns show up to share the ice with them. The father is so over-the-top, he seems to be impersonating Danny McBride at his most outrageous. When encountered with the dangerous beast, they eschew all logical choices to serve themselves up as fish food. It's all so awkward and clunky and familiar, there's not much fun to be had.  Maybe that's my primary problem with "Hypothermia." It takes itself so darn seriously. A little camp or humor would have lightened things up immeasurably. I love bad movie monster mayhem more than most. But "Hypothermia" wants to play as a straight-up shocker. But without genuine thrills or originality, it falls short of its goals. I loved the ridiculous creature! In a humorous spoof, it would have been an outrageously successful creation. But is it scary? Don't make me answer that. Enacting every cliche that you've come to expect, "Hypothermia" simply doesn't serve up satisfying drama or tension. The 73 minutes felt easily twice as long, especially when their cozy house is just a few paces away from the deadly mayhem. A silly and unoriginal misfire. KGHarris, 9/12.
 This is a heavily abridged version of Peter Brook's wonderful film.  About 1/2 the film has been cut from this version.  I owned the VCR version of this movie which is 325 minutes long.  I had assumed this was a long-awaited reprint of an out-of-print classic.  Instead, this is a HEAVILY abridged (170-minute) version of the show.  I bought this as a birthday present for my husband, after five minutes of watching painful cut after painful cut, we had to turn the film off.  I will be returning it ASAP.  I have NO IDEA why the studio did this.  Amazon.com should mark this as an ABRIDGED VERSION.  I can only hope that the studio comes to their senses and released a version of the DVD that is the full 325 minutes, because the VCR tapes I bought 14 years ago are wearing out...
 I have been eagerly awaiting Peter Brooks' The Mahabharata on DVD, and today it arrived.  How disappointed I was to find this version is a little over half as long as the one shown on the BBC and PBS.  I have not watched this version yet, but I cannot believe it will be anything but a slice-and-dice version of the epic tale that I came to love in its television miniseries form and later on laserdisc.  So a warning to everyone
 This is a disappointing, sliced and diced version of the long epic shown on public television many years ago.  The cuts change the storyline and make it difficult to follow, especially in reference to the amazing 5+ hour original.  Buyer beware!  This is not the original, full length version.
 I was disappointed when this version came out that people were being negative about it without even purchasing it. I didn't heed their warning and purchased it anyway.  We live in a great age. We can get complete seasons of television shows. We can get movies with hours of behind the scene footage that enhance the experience. With all of these great things, why would a company abridge a great work like this? The six hour version was already abridged from the nine hour play. The nine hour play was abridged from a 5000 page book.  I tried to watch this version but I felt like I was seeing a flashback episode of a TV series.  We all have been awaiting a re-release of the six hour version. This is an insult to a great work.
 Dammit - I wish I had read the reviews more carefully - this is so badly abridged that if you don't know the story already it is very difficult to follow. I have wasted my money on this, and will now have to buy the full version.
 I didn't realize how good 'Song of Norway' was until I watched this film, which is almost as bad as Gilliam's 'Jabberwocky'.  Peter Brook, like Terry Gilliam, is one of the great charlatans of our time.  Each man is a self-important destroyer of good literature.  Whatever Gilliam touches he turns into boring uncleanness.  Whatever Brook touches he turns into a model of his own ininteresting self.  There is neither health nor beauty in Brook's 'Mahabharata'.  If you want to watch a proper 'Mahabarata', get the Chopra version.  Brook's 'international' version is squalid, boring, and all wrong.  It will be enjoyed only by the illiterate and the perverse.  Let me say something in passing.  The RSC has been for at least three decades an example of all that is bad in the modern arts world.  When will British critics stop treating it as a divine manifestation?  We British have suffered horribly at the hands of our home-grown 'talents' since the 1960s.  Some day we'll get a healthy-minded director who will make faithful films of the John Buchan novels.  Many of us are fed up with directors whose minds are unclean and utterly dull.  The duty of a film-maker is to enchant, to entertain
 In reading the positive reviews of the movie, I was wondering if one needed to take some kind of exotic drugs to write them, and then I wondered wouldn't it be easier just to take the drugs and forget the movie?  Honestly, this one of the worst films I have ever seen since "Plan 9 From Outer Space" and the "Freddy Got Fingered." The production values were poor to say the least. It was hard to identify the the characters and their motivations because no one stands out. Most of the characters were pretty uninteresting or strange, i.e., the woman who gave birth to a bowling ball for example. [Seriously, it is in there. I'm not making it up.] I could not figure out the lineages of the families because they were a pretty mixed group. There was even a Kung Fu master in the film and that part was a bit like Kung Fu meets the Sons of Hercules. Which begs the question, if you are going to have a Kung Fu master why not attack helicopters and rocket grenades, too? Could any film be worse?  No, actually -- this is pretty bad.  It is like watching a bad Star Trek movie if you aren't a fan of Star Trek or familiar with the myth or back-story. One point the woman's future husband is blind so she chooses to wear a blindfold for the rest of her life. What that accomplishes I don't know but there it is.  If you like really bad gladiator movies, this could be your film. Yikes!
 I read on internet about this western version of Mahabharata and was curious to watch how Peter Brook captured it with his western mindset. After watching the movie on DVD which I bought, I was shocked and repented for buying it in first place. It was completely un-artistic and several incidents depicted in the movie are incorrect and the characters barring Draupadi  are hardly any reflection of the characters that Indians understand. Perhaps it is more apt to say that an average indian without knowledge of this movie wouldn't have guessed that he/she was watching Mahabharata. I am sure it's offensive to Hindu's faith, I think Mr.Brook should have limited his ambitions to produce simple stories rather than attempting to screen the greatest epic on earth with his limited understanding and parochial vision and in the process, reducing it to lower than street side drama. Suffice to say that the dramas played by primary school kids were several cuts above this movie. If I had an option, I would have given negative rating !
 Warning to Moms of young children.  I let my 4 year watch this movie.  She adores it and I did not think I had anything to worry about with it until she started saying "I Hate My Life".  When I asked her where she learned to say that and she said from the Barbie movie.  Sure enough, that's what Barbie says in it.  I am shocked phrases like this were in a Barbie movie and I am very disappointed
 Very disappointed by the preview.  My daughter loves all of the Barbie videos and is now very interested in a video that highlights "sophmore year," and "did he kiss you?!" comments.  Up until now Barbie videos have been based on fantasy play and imaginative play and this new viedo applies to real life situations that are too old for the crowd of girls it has always appealed to.  Lions Gate or Mattel has, in my opinion, missed the mark on this one.  Any parent who buys this Barbie Diaries video for their young daughter is just wishing their youth away.